Hawaii statutes.
§431:31-107 Application for license and
fees. (a) A sworn application for a license under this article shall be
filed with the commissioner on forms prescribed and furnished by the
commissioner.

(b) The application for a license shall
provide the:

(1) Name, residence address, electronic-mail address,
and other information required by the commissioner for an employee or officer
of the vendor that is designated by the applicant as the person responsible for
the vendor's compliance with the requirements of this article; provided that,
if the vendor derives more than fifty per cent of its revenue from the sale of
portable electronics insurance, the information in this paragraph shall be
provided for all officers, directors, and shareholders of record having
beneficial ownership of ten per cent or more of any class of securities
registered under the federal securities law; and

(2) Location of the applicant's home office.

(c) Any vendor engaging in portable
electronics insurance transactions on or before [January 1, 2013,] shall apply
for licensure within ninety days of the application's being made available by
the commissioner. Any applicant commencing operations after [January 1, 2013,]
shall obtain a license prior to offering portable electronics insurance.

(d) Initial licenses issued pursuant to this
article shall be valid for a period of not less than twenty-four months.
Renewed licenses shall be valid for a period of twenty-four months.

(e) Each vendor licensed under this article
shall pay to the commissioner a fee of $5,000 for the issuance of the initial
portable electronics limited lines license, plus a license fee of $2,500 per
year for the initial or renewal term. A pro rata portion of the license fee
may be applied for a partial year of the initial term. [L 2012, c 321, pt of §1;
am L 2013, c 194, §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next